Utah statutes.
78B-10-110.   Participation in mediation.

An attorney or other individual designated by a party may accompany the party to, and participate in, a mediation.  A waiver of participation given before the mediation may be rescinded.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

